Hawaii statutes.
[§658G-5]
Beginning and concluding a collaborative law process. (a) A
collaborative law process begins when the parties sign a collaborative law
participation agreement.

(b) A tribunal may not order a party to
participate in a collaborative law process over that party's objection.

(c) A collaborative law process is concluded
by:

(1) The resolution of a collaborative matter as
evidenced by a signed record;

(2) The resolution of a part of the collaborative
matter, evidenced by a signed record, in which the parties agree that the
remaining parts of the matter will not be resolved in the process; or

(3) The termination of the process.

(d) A collaborative law process terminates:

(1) When a party gives notice to other parties in a
record that the process is ended; or

(2) When a party:

(A) Begins a proceeding related to a
collaborative matter without the agreement of all parties; or

(B) In a pending proceeding related to the
matter:

(i) Initiates a pleading, motion, order to
show cause, or request for a conference with the tribunal;

(ii) Requests that the proceeding be put on the
tribunal's active calendar; or

(iii) Takes similar action requiring notice to
be sent to the parties; or

(3) Except as otherwise provided by subsection (e),
when a party discharges a collaborative lawyer or a collaborative lawyer
withdraws from further representation of a party.

(e) A party's collaborative lawyer shall give
prompt notice to all other parties in a record of a discharge or withdrawal.

(f) A party may terminate a collaborative law
process with or without cause.

(g) Notwithstanding the discharge or
withdrawal of a collaborative lawyer, a collaborative law process continues, if
not later than thirty days after the date that the notice of the discharge or
withdrawal of a collaborative lawyer required by subsection (d)(3) is sent to
the parties:

(1) The unrepresented party engages a successor
collaborative lawyer; and

(2) In a signed record:

(A) The parties consent to continue the
process by reaffirming the collaborative law participation agreement;

(B) The agreement is amended to identify the
successor collaborative lawyer; and

(C) The successor collaborative lawyer
confirms the lawyer's representation of a party in the collaborative process.

(h) A collaborative law process does not
conclude if, with the consent of the parties, a party requests a tribunal to
approve a resolution of the collaborative matter or any part thereof as
evidenced by a signed record.

(i) A collaborative law participation
agreement may provide additional methods of concluding a collaborative law
process. [L 2012, c 207, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next